dictsource/mfe_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// translation rules for Mauritian Creole

// Consonants
.L01 b ch d f g h j k l m n p r s t v w x y z


.group a
   a       a
   a (_   'a
   a (L01_ 'a
   a (L01L01_ 'a
   an (_  'A~
   ann     an
   ann (_ 'an

.group b
   b       b

.group ch
   ch      tS

.group d
   d       d[

.group e
   e       e
   e (_   'e
   e (L01_ 'e
   e (L01L01_ 'e
   en (_  'E~
   er      Wr
   er (_   'Wr
   enn     En
   enn (_ 'En

.group f
   f       f

.group g
   g       g
   gn      n^

.group h
   h       h

.group i
   i       i
   i (_   'i
   i (L01_ 'i
   i (L01L01_ 'i
   in (_  'E~
   inn     in
   inn (_ 'in

.group j
   j       Z

.group k
   k       k

.group l
   l       l

.group m
   m       m

.group n
   n       n
   ng      N

.group o
   o       o
   o (_   'o
   o (L01_ 'o
   o (L01L01_ 'o
   on (_   'O~
   ou      u
   ou (_  'u
   onn     On
   onn (_ 'On
   ounn    un
   ounn (_ 'un

.group p
   p       p

.group r
   r       r

.group s
   s       s
   sh      S

.group t
   t       t[

.group u
   u       V
   u (_   'V
   u (L01_ 'V
   u (L01L01 'V

.group v
   v       v

.group w
   w       w

.group x
   x       ks

.group y
   y       j

.group z
   z       z
   
